Louisiana, session 2026, HB1095.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2009.24(C)(1)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2009.24. Alternative electrical power source required
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1095 ENROLLED
C.(1) The generator or alternate electrical power source shall be permanently
installed onsite at the nursing facility and shall have fuel or other alternative power
generation source stored onsite at the nursing facility or delivered prior to the
emergency event, in the following quantities:
* * *
Section 2. Chapter 5 of Subtitle VII of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 47:6401, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5. NURSING FACILITY ALTERNATIVE ELECTRICAL POWER
SOURCES REBATE
§6401. Rebate; eligible costs of alternative electrical power sources for certain
nursing facilities
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them in this Subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative electrical power source" means a solar energy system placed
into service on or after January 1, 2026, and containing an array of photovoltaic
modules designed to convert sunlight into electrical energy for usage or storage and
related equipment, wiring, and mounting components.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) "Eligible costs" means the costs incurred and actually expended by the
nursing facility or its designated contractor to acquire, install, and place into service
an alternative electrical power source in the nursing facility as required by R.S.
40:2009.24.
(4) "Nursing facility" has the same meaning as set forth in R.S. 40:2009.2(2)
and that is licensed by the Louisiana Department of Health in accordance with the
requirements of R.S. 40:2009.3, and that was eligible to receive federal grant funds
related to energy resilience through the U.S. Department of Energy Grid Resilience
and Innovation Partnerships Program prior to cancellation of the program.
B.(1) Subject to the limitations provided for in this Section, a nursing facility
shall be eligible for a rebate of eligible costs of an alternative electrical power source
installed at or on the nursing facility property.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1095 ENROLLED
(2) To claim the rebate, the nursing facility shall apply to the department
with satisfactory documentation demonstrating that the nursing facility is in
compliance with R.S. 40:2009.24. Such documentation shall include all of the
following:
(a) An itemized list of eligible costs.
(b) A sworn statement by the contractor certifying that the alternative
electrical power source is sufficient to simultaneously provide electrical power to
each of the systems, areas, and services enumerated in R.S. 40:2009.24(B).
(c) Additional documentation as may be deemed necessary by the
department.
(3) The department shall review the application and documentation to
determine compliance with R.S. 40:2009.24. Following its review, the department
shall certify for rebate the eligible costs and shall decline certification for any
ineligible costs. The department shall provide to the nursing facility and Department
of Revenue a certification letter with the eligible costs for rebate. The issuance of
certification shall be on a first-come, first-served basis.
C.(1) Upon receipt of the certification letter and subject to Paragraph (2) of
this Subsection, the Department of Revenue shall remit to the nursing facility the
rebate authorized by this Section from the current collections of revenues from
Chapter 2 of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, as
amended.
(2) Prior to issuing a rebate, the Department of Revenue shall offset the
amount of the rebate against any other liability, tax or otherwise, collectible and due
to the state from the nursing home, its related parties, and its owners.
(3) The total amount of rebates paid by the Department of Revenue pursuant
to the provisions of this Section shall not exceed two million dollars.
D. The rebate authorized pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall
terminate on January 1, 2029, and the Department of Revenue shall not pay any
rebates on or after January 1, 2029.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1095 ENROLLED
Section 3.(A) Section 2 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
(B) This Section and Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on August 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.